New Mexico, session 2026, HB29.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the military base impact fund for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years for the purposes of the fund. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. .232630.1